Maine, session 132, LD1507.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §542, sub-§9-E is enacted to read:
9-E. Short message service or SMS. "Short message service" or "SMS" means a text
messaging service component of most mobile telephones and mobile device systems that
uses standardized communication protocols and that allows the exchange of short text
messages, typically transmitted over cellular networks.
Sec. 2. 38 MRSA §542, sub-§10, as enacted by PL 1969, c. 572, §1, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
10. Transfer or transferred. "Transfer" or "transferred" means both onloading and
offloading of oil between an oil terminal facility and a vessel; a vessel and another vessel;
or an oil terminal facility and a vehicle.
Sec. 3. 38 MRSA §542, sub-§10-B is enacted to read:
10-B. Vehicle. "Vehicle" has the same meaning as in Title 29-A, section 101,
subsection 91.
Sec. 4. 38 MRSA §546-D is enacted to read:
§546-D. Community notification
1. Community notification plan. An owner or operator of an oil terminal facility
shall develop and implement a plan for electronic notification to the community of the
transfer of oil. For purposes of this section, "community" means the general public of the
municipality where the oil terminal facility is located and other members of the general
public who reside or work in adjacent municipalities or have an interest in receiving
notifications under this section. The plan must include:
A. An electronic notification system using SMS or similar technology to provide
notice of a transfer to a member of the public who requests the notice;
B. A provision for notice to be given once per day of every transfer anticipated in the
24-hour period following the notice;
C. For each notice, the following information regarding each transfer:
(1) The name and location of the terminal or, if the transfer is being conducted
offshore, the name and location of the anchorage;
(2) The approximate amount of oil to be transferred;
(3) The type of oil to be transferred;
(4) If the transfer involves a vessel, the name of the vessel or other identifier;
(5) The expected time and date of the transfer; and
(6) A description of any hazardous vapors that may be released during the transfer;
D. An agreement with an entity providing SMS or similar technology as required by
paragraph A;
E. The process that allows a member of the public to request and receive the notice;
and
Page 1 - 132LR2055(01)

F. A description, including time frame, for implementation of the plan.
The owner or operator shall annually update the community notification plan by July 1st.
2. Review of community notification plan. An owner or operator of an oil terminal
facility shall provide a copy of the community notification plan under subsection 1 to the
department and the municipality in which the oil terminal facility is located. The
department or the municipality may make comments and recommended changes to the plan
prior to implementation of the plan, which must be approved by the department and the
municipality.
3. Public access to plan; periodic changes. The owner or operator of an oil terminal
facility shall post the approved community notification plan under subsection 2 on a
publicly accessible website. The owner or operator may make periodic changes to the plan,
subject to review by the department and the municipality under subsection 2. By July 1st
of each year, the owner or operator shall provide a copy of the current plan to the
department and the municipality and post the current plan on a publicly accessible website.
4. Enforcement. In addition to any other penalties provided by law, an owner or
operator of an oil terminal facility who violates this section is subject to enforcement action
by the department including the revocation of a license under sections 544 and 545.
Sec. 5. Timeline for existing oil terminal facilities. By January 1, 2026, an
owner or operator of an oil terminal facility that exists and is licensed under the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 38, sections 544 and 545 on the effective date of this Act shall
submit a community notification plan under Title 38, section 546-D for review by the
Department of Environmental Protection and the municipality in which the oil terminal
facility is located pursuant to Title 38, section 546-D, subsection 2. By July 1, 2026, the
owner or operator shall implement the plan reviewed and approved by the department and
the municipality under this section and the owner or operator shall post the approved plan
on a publicly accessible website.